Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1991, 1993, 2000, 2010, and 2018 to make other minor word and punctuation changes.

Administrative Code. —

For insurer — financial, see 3 AAC 21.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 1, FSSLA 2005 (HB 147), the basis of a number of the 2005 amendments to this title intended to make insurance licensing processes more efficient and to bring Alaska’s law into greater conformity with those of other states, see 2005 House Journal 311 — 312.